Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB630.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 519 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of failure to report a serious crime when he or she:
(a) Observes the commission of a serious crime under circumstances in which a
reasonable person would believe that an offense resulting in serious
physical injury or death has been committed; and
(b) Fails to immediately report the commission of the offense to a peace officer
or law enforcement agency under circumstances in which:
1. A reasonable person would believe that the commission of the offense
has not been reported; and
2. The person could immediately report the commission of the offense
without placing himself or herself in danger of suffering serious
physical injury or death.
(2) Failure to report a serious crime is a Class A misdemeanor.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/11/2026 2:24 PM Jacketed